Utah statutes.
58-78-302.   Qualifications for licensure -- Licensure by credential.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), an applicant for licensure as a vocational rehabilitation counselor under this chapter shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form as prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504 to recover the costs of administering licensing requirements relating to vocational rehabilitation counselors;

(c)  be of good moral character;

(d)  provide satisfactory evidence of having earned a master's degree in rehabilitation counseling or a related field;

(e)  provide satisfactory evidence of having 4,000 hours of disability related work experience under the supervision of a licensed vocational rehabilitation counselor, except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2); and

(f)  meet the examination requirement established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board.

(2)  The division may issue a license under this chapter to an individual who is licensed in another state or jurisdiction to practice vocational rehabilitation counseling if the division finds that the other state or jurisdiction has substantially the same or higher licensure requirements as this state.

